apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="سولەیمان__np">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ێکی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکەی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ەکانی</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="ساڵح"><i>ساڵح</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="تیرێژ"><i>تیرێژ</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئازاد"><i>ئازاد</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="حەسەن"><i>حەسەن</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەحمەد"><i>ئەحمەد</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="موحەممەد"><i>موحەممەد</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="عەبدول"><i>عەبدول</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="جۆرج"><i>جۆرج</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سەڵاحەدین"><i>سەڵاحەدین</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="جەلال"><i>جەلال</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سولەیمان"><i>سولەیمان</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="حوسێن"><i>حوسێن</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="یەسووع"><i>یەسووع</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="محەمەد"><i>محەمەد</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="قاسم"><i>قاسم</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕزگار"><i>ڕزگار</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ویلیام"><i>ویلیام</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سەلیم"><i>سەلیم</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="خالید"><i>خالید</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="شەن"><i>شەن</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="حەسەن"><i>حەسەن</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ماملێ"><i>ماملێ</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئادەم"><i>ئادەم</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="عەزیز"><i>عەزیز</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئارام"><i>ئارام</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="کێپلەر"><i>کێپلەر</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="تۆماس"><i>تۆماس</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="فیلیپ"><i>فیلیپ</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەمیر"><i>ئەمیر</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ناپلیۆن"><i>ناپلیۆن</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="لویس"><i>لویس</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="شکسپیر"><i>شکسپیر</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="شەریف"><i>شەریف</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ئالان"><i>ئالان</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="سەلاحەدین"><i>سەلاحەدین</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕیچارد"><i>ڕیچارد</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="ناسر"><i>ناسر</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="جەیمز"><i>جەیمز</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
      <e lm="تیرێژ"><i>تیرێژ</i><par n="سولەیمان__np"/></e>
